src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
< [ h e a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  h e a r %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ h e a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r s %  i t %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ h e a r %  h i s %  i t s %  v o i c e "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  h e a r d %  [ h i s | h e r | i t s ] %  v o i c e ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ p e r h a p s %  h e a r %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ p e r h a p s %  s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  h e a r %  i t %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+Neg" ] : [ I %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+Neg" ] : [ y o u %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+Neg" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+Neg" ] : [ w e %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+Neg" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+Neg" ] : [ t h e y %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ m i g h t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+Neg" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  m i g h t %  n o t %  j u m p %  l a t e r %  o n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  j u m p e d ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  a l o n g %  b e %  a b o u t %  t o %  j u m p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  j u m p i n g %  [ a l o n g | a b o u t ] %  t o %  j u m p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  j u m p s %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  j u m p %  u p %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  j u m p %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  j u m p e d %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  i s %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  a r e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ b e %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  j u s t %  a b o u t %  t o %  b e %  j u m p i n g %  u p ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] : [ y o u %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] : [ w e %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ j u m p e d %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  j u m p e d %  i n ] > # ;
< [ s t a r t %  t o %  j u m p %  i n "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] : [ I %  a m %  s t a r t i n g %  t o %  j u m p %  i n ] > # ;
